Connecticut, session 2026, HB05455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than July 1, 2027,
the president of The University of Connecticut shall establish a
recruitment and retention program for The University of Connecticut
special police forces and fire department to address critical staffing
shortages and high resignation rates. As part of such program, the
president of The University of Connecticut shall develop: (1) Salary
schedules for all sworn members of the university's special police forces
and all members of the fire department, and (2) an education benefit to
reward such members' long-term commitment and acquisition of
institutional knowledge critical to higher education and hospital
environments.
(b) (1) The salary schedules described in subdivision (1) of subsection
(a) of this section shall: (A) Align the compensation rates of the sworn
members of the university's special police forces and the members of the
fire department with the compensation rates of members of comparable
municipal and state law enforcement and fire service agencies to
eliminate any pay disparities between the members of such agencies
and the sworn members of the university's special police forces and the
members of the fire department, and (B) eliminate any significant step
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5455
overlaps between ranks to ensure that supervisors do not earn less than
the personnel they supervise.
(2) The president shall provide the salary schedules developed
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to the Office of Labor
Relations and the collective bargaining unit representing the sworn
members of the university's special police forces and the members of the
fire department. Such salary schedules: (A) Shall be a mandatory subject
of the negotiations between the Office of Labor Relations and such
collective bargaining unit (i) relating to salary, including, but not limited
to, any wage reopener, and (ii) next occurring after the president has
provided such salary schedules to said office and the collective
bargaining unit, and (B) may be a subject of any negotiations between
the Office of Labor Relations and such collective bargaining unit
occurring after the president has provided such salary schedules to said
office and the collective bargaining unit, but before the negotiations
described in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, by mutual agreement
of said office and such bargaining unit.
(c) (1) The president of The University of Connecticut shall develop
the parameters of the education benefit described in subdivision (2) of
subsection (a) of this section. Such parameters: (A) May include, but
need not be limited to, tuition reimbursement or university fee waivers,
and (B) shall (i) include, but need not be limited to, the required years
of service for eligibility, and (ii) allow dependents of the sworn members
of the university's special police forces and the members of the fire
department to be eligible for such education benefit, under terms and
conditions established by the president.
(2) The president shall provide the parameters of the education
benefit developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
Commissioner of Administrative Services. Notwithstanding the
provisions of any applicable collective bargaining agreement or chapter
68 of the general statutes, upon receipt of such parameters from the
president, the commissioner shall implement the education benefit
without modification.
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5455
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027,
and annually thereafter, the president of The University of Connecticut
shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes, on the recruitment and retention status of the
university's special police forces and fire department to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security and higher education and
employment advancement and to the Board of Trustees of The
University of Connecticut. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, for both the special police forces and the fire department: (1)
The total number of authorized positions compared to filled positions,
including a breakdown of any vacancies due to unfilled positions,
personnel being in academy training or field training or personnel being
on administrative, military or medical leave, (2) the total number of any
resignations, retirements and terminations that occurred during the
preceding year, including the average seniority of departing personnel,
(3) a detailed assessment of the forces' or department's ability to provide
mandated coverage at all applicable campuses and facilities, and (4) an
analysis of the financial impact of any costs incurred to train and recruit
personnel who resign within five years of being hired.
Sec. 3. Subsection (d) of section 10a-156b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(d) [The] Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 68, the president
of The University of Connecticut shall establish classifications for the
special police forces positions for The University of Connecticut at Storrs
and its several campuses, including The University of Connecticut
Health Center in Farmington, using objective job-related criteria,
including, but not limited to: (1) Knowledge and skill required to carry
out the duties of each position, including the skill required (A) in high-
density campus environments, (B) to provide student-focused
community outreach services, and (C) to provide specialized emergency
services within The University of Connecticut Health Center in
Farmington, (2) mental and physical effort required to carry out the
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5455
duties of each position, [and] (3) the level of accountability assigned to
each position, and (4) the responsibilities associated with exercising
jurisdiction at multiple campuses throughout the state. The president
shall establish and administer all necessary examinations for such
special police forces.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Sec. 3 from passage 10a-156b(d)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a), "all sworn members of the university's special police
forces and fire department" was changed to "all sworn members of the
university's special police forces and all members of the fire
department" and in Sections 1(b) and 1(c)(1), "the sworn members of the
university's special police forces and fire department" was changed to
"the sworn members of the university's special police forces and the
members of the fire department" for accuracy.
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4